Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 2 Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority (MARTA)

Editor’s notes.

Code Sections 32-9-13 and 32-9-14 were designated as Article 2 by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930, effective May 3, 2018.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 431, § 3/HB 714, not codified by the General Assembly, amended the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243) in Section 10 by revising subsection (t) to read: “Any action to protect or enforce any rights under the provisions of this Act or any suit or action against such Authority, except as provided in Section 9(c), shall be brought in either State or Superior Court of Fulton County, Georgia, and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under the provisions of this Act shall likewise be brought in said court, which shall have exclusive, original jurisdiction of such actions.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rapid Transit Tax, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Sales and Use Tax Division, Rapid Transit Tax, Subject 560-12-4.

32-9-13.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authority” means the authority created by the MARTA Act and pursuant to a local constitutional amendment for purposes of establishing a metropolitan area system of public transportation set out at Ga. L. 1964, p. 1008.

“Board” means the board of directors of the authority.

“City” means the City of Atlanta.

“MARTA Act” means an Act known as the “Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965,” approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended.

“Metropolitan area” means the Counties of Clayton, Cobb, DeKalb, Fulton, and Gwinnett and the city.

“Qualified municipality” shall have the same meaning as provided in paragraph (4) of Code Section 48-8-110.

“Regional transit plan” means the official multiyear plan for transit services and facilities adopted pursuant to Code Section 50-39-12.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 105, § 1-1/SB 369; Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 32/SB 52.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, deleted the subsection (a) designation; substituted “article” for “Code section” in the introductory paragraph; added “and pursuant to a local constitutional amendment for purposes of establishing a metropolitan area system of public transportation set out at Ga. L. 1964, p. 1008” at the end of paragraph (1); added present paragraph (2); redesignated former paragraphs (2) and (3) as present paragraphs (3) and (4), respectively; added paragraphs (5) through (7); and redesignated former subsections (b) through (g) as present Code Section 32-9-14.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, in paragraph (5), substituted “Counties” for “counties” and substituted “city” for “City”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, Code Section 32-9-13, as enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 32/HB 737, was redesignated as Code Section 32-9-14.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 32-9-13, pertaining to suspension of restrictions on use of annual proceeds from local sales and use taxes by public transit authorities, was repealed by Ga. L. 2014, p. 649, § 1/HB 265, effective June 1, 2014. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 3/HB 277.

32-9-14.
Procedures, conditions, and limitations for levy of additional retail sales and use tax by City of Atlanta for MARTA services.

Any provisions to the contrary in the MARTA Act notwithstanding and pursuant to the authority granted under a provision of the Constitution enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 1008, the city shall be authorized to levy a retail sales and use tax up to 0.50 percent under the provisions set forth in this Code section. Such tax shall be in addition to any tax which is currently authorized and collected under the MARTA Act. The city may elect to hold a referendum in 2016 as provided for by this Code section by the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by its governing body on or prior to June 30, 2016; provided, however, that if the city does not adopt a resolution or ordinance on or prior to June 30, 2016, it may elect to hold a referendum at the November, 2017, municipal general election by the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by its governing body to that effect on or prior to June 30, 2017. Such additional tax shall not count toward any local sales tax limitation provided for by Code Section 48-8-6. Any tax imposed under this Code section at a rate of less than 0.50 percent shall be in an increment of 0.05 percent. Any tax imposed under this Code section shall run concurrently as to duration of the levy with the 1 percent tax currently levied pursuant to the MARTA Act.

No later than May 31 of the year a referendum is to be called for as provided in this Code section, the authority shall submit to the city a preliminary list of new rapid transit projects within or serving the geographical area of the city which may be funded in whole or in part by the proceeds of the additional tax authorized by this Code section.

No later than July 31 of the year a referendum is to be called for as provided in this Code section, the authority shall submit to the city a final list of new rapid transit projects within or serving the city to be funded in whole or in part by the proceeds of the tax authorized by this Code section. Such final list of new rapid transit projects shall be incorporated into the rapid transit contract established under Section 24 of the MARTA Act between the authority and the city upon approval by the qualified voters of the city of the referendum to levy the additional tax authorized by this Code section.

Before the additional tax authorized under this Code section shall become valid, the tax shall be approved by a majority of qualified voters of the city in a referendum thereon. The procedure for holding the referendum called for in this Code section shall be as follows: There shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation throughout the city, once each week for four weeks immediately preceding the week during which the referendum is to be held, a notice to the electors thereof that on the day named therein an election will be held to determine the question of whether or not the tax authorized by this Code section should be collected in the city for the purpose of expanding and enhancing the rapid transit system. Such election shall be held in all the election districts within the territorial limits of the city. The question to be presented to the electorate in any such referendum shall be stated on the ballots or ballot labels as follows:

Click to view

The question shall be published as a part of the aforesaid notice of election. Each such election shall be governed, held, and conducted in accordance with the provisions of law from time to time governing the holding of special elections. After the returns of such an election have been received, and the same have been canvassed and computed, the result shall be certified to the governing body of the city, in addition to any other person designated by law to receive the same, and such governing body shall officially declare the result thereof. Each election called by the governing body of the city under the provisions of this Code section shall be governed by and conducted in accordance with the provisions of law governing the holding of elections by the city. The expense of any such election shall be paid by the city.

If a majority of those voting in such an election vote in favor of the proposition submitted, then the rapid transit contract between the authority and the city shall authorize the levy and collection of the tax provided for by this Code section, and the final list provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall be incorporated therein. All of the proceeds derived from the additional tax provided for by this Code section shall be first allocated for payment of the cost of the rapid transit projects incorporated in such contract, except as otherwise provided by the terms of such rapid transit contract, and thereafter, upon completion and payment of such rapid transit projects, as provided for in such contract and this Code section. It shall be the policy of the authority to provide that the tax collected under this Code section in an amount exceeding the cost of the rapid transit projects incorporated in the contract shall be expended solely within and for the benefit of the city. When a tax is imposed under this Code section, the rate of any tax approved as provided for by Article 5A of Chapter 8 of Title 48 shall and the tax provided for by this Code section, in aggregate, shall not exceed a rate of 1 percent.

If a majority of those voting in an election provided for by this Code section in 2016 vote against the proposition submitted, the city may elect to resubmit such proposition on the date of the November, 2017, municipal general election by the adoption of a resolution or ordinance to that effect on or prior to June 30, 2017, subject to the provisions of this Code section.

Except as provided for to the contrary in this Code section, the additional tax provided for by this Code section shall be collected in the same manner and under the same conditions as set forth in Section 25 of the MARTA Act.

The tax provided for by this Code section shall not be subject to any restrictions as to rate provided for by the MARTA Act and shall not be subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) or subsection (k) of Section 25 of the MARTA Act.

A tax levied under this paragraph shall be added to the state sales and use tax imposed by Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 48 and the state revenue commissioner is authorized and directed to establish a bracket system by appropriate rules and regulations to collect the tax imposed under this paragraph in the city.

“( ) YES Shall an additional sales tax of ( percent be collected in the City of insert percentage) ( ) NO Atlanta for the purpose of significantly expanding and enhancing MARTA transit service in Atlanta?”

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 105, § 1-1/SB 369; Code 1981, §

32-9-14

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 32/SB 52.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, redesignated former subsections (b) through (g) of former Code Section 32-9-13 as subsections (a) through (f) of present Code Section 32-9-14, respectively; in subsection (a), substituted “0.50” for “.50” twice, substituted “Code section” for “part” twice, substituted “0.05” for “.05” in the fifth sentence, and substituted “MARTA Act” for “ ‘Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965,’ approved March 10, 1965 (Ga. L. 1965, p. 2243), as amended” at the end of the last sentence; and substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsection (c)” near the end of the first sentence of present subsection (d). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “(insert percentage)” for “(

insert percentage

)” in the ballot question in subsection (c).

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 32-9-13, pertaining to suspension of restrictions on use of annual proceeds from local sales and use taxes by public transit authorities, was repealed by Ga. L. 2014, p. 649, § 1/HB 265, effective June 1, 2014. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 3/HB 277.

32-9-15.
Procedures, conditions, and limitations for levy of additional retail sales and use tax by Fulton County for MARTA services; transit oriented development.

Any provisions to the contrary in the MARTA Act notwithstanding and pursuant to the authority granted under a provision of the Constitution enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 1008, the governing authority of Fulton County shall be authorized to levy a retail sales and use tax up to 0.20 percent in the portion of such county located outside the jurisdictional limits of the city upon satisfaction of the provisions set forth in this Code section. Such tax shall be in addition to any tax which is currently authorized and collected under the MARTA Act. Such additional tax shall not count toward any local sales tax limitation provided for by Code Section 48-8-6. Such additional tax shall not be utilized to fund heavy rail. Any tax imposed under this Code section at a rate of less than 0.20 percent shall be in an increment of 0.05 percent. The minimum period of time for the imposition of the tax imposed under this Code section shall be ten years and the maximum period of time for the imposition shall not exceed 30 years.

Prior to the call for a referendum authorized by this Code section, the governing authority of Fulton County shall deliver or mail a written notice to the authority and to the mayor or chief elected official in each qualified municipality located within such county and outside the jurisdictional limits of the city. Such notice shall contain the date, time, place, and purpose of a meeting at which the authority and the governing authority of such county and of each qualified municipality are to meet to discuss possible projects within or serving the geographical area of the county which may be funded in whole or in part by the proceeds of the additional tax authorized by this Code section and the rate of such tax. The notice shall be delivered or mailed at least ten days prior to the date of the meeting. The meeting shall be held at least 60 days prior to the issuance of the call for the referendum.

Following the meeting required by subsection (b) of this Code section and prior to any tax being imposed under this Code section, the qualified municipalities and governing authority representing at least 70 percent of the population of Fulton County outside the boundaries of the city may execute an intergovernmental agreement memorializing their agreement to the levy of a tax and the rate of such tax; provided, however, that no tax shall be authorized to be imposed under this Code section if no such intergovernmental agreement is entered into. An intergovernmental agreement authorized by this subsection shall, at a minimum, include:

If such tax is to be levied after January 1, 2019, a list of the projects proposed to be funded from the tax which shall be from the regional transit plan and approved by the Atlanta-regional Transit Link “ATL” Authority;

The rate of tax to be imposed upon approval of a referendum; and

The duration of the tax to be imposed upon approval of a referendum.

Upon execution of an intergovernmental agreement as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section, the governing authority of Fulton County shall be authorized to enter into a rapid transit service contract based upon the conditions agreed to in such intergovernmental agreement. Such rapid transit service contract shall incorporate the list of projects included in the intergovernmental agreement pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section. Such rapid transit contract shall become effective and binding only upon passage of a referendum approving the imposition of an additional tax held in accordance with the provisions of subsection (e) of this Code section.

Before the additional tax authorized under this Code section shall become valid or the rapid transit contract shall become binding, the tax shall be approved by a majority of qualified voters in Fulton County residing outside the jurisdictional boundaries of the city in a referendum thereon. The procedure for holding the referendum called for in this Code section shall be as follows: There shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation throughout Fulton County, once each week for four weeks immediately preceding the week during which the referendum is to be held, a notice to the electors thereof that on the day named therein an election will be held to determine the question of whether or not the tax authorized by this Code section should be collected in Fulton County for the purpose of expanding and enhancing the rapid transit system. Such election shall be held in all the election districts within the territorial limits of Fulton County located outside the jurisdictional boundaries of the city. The question to be presented to the electorate in any such referendum shall be stated on the ballots or ballot labels as follows:

Click to view

The question shall be published as a part of the aforesaid notice of election. Each such election shall be governed, held, and conducted in accordance with the provisions of law from time to time governing the holding of special elections. After the returns of such an election have been received, and the same have been canvassed and computed, the result shall be certified to the board of commissioners of Fulton County, in addition to any other person designated by law to receive the same, and such board of commissioners shall officially declare the result thereof. Each election called by the board of commissioners of Fulton County under the provisions of this Code section shall be governed by and conducted in accordance with the provisions of law governing the holding of elections by such county. The expense of any such election shall be paid by the county.

If a majority of those voting in such an election vote in favor of the proposition submitted, then the rapid transit contract between the authority and Fulton County shall be binding and the levy and collection of the tax provided for by this Code section shall be authorized. All of the proceeds derived from the additional tax provided for by this Code section shall be first allocated for payment of the cost of the rapid transit projects incorporated in such contract, except as otherwise provided by the terms of such rapid transit contract, and thereafter, upon completion and payment of such rapid transit projects, as provided for in such contract and this Code section. It shall be the policy of the authority to provide that the tax collected under this Code section in an amount exceeding the cost of the rapid transit projects incorporated in the contract shall be expended solely within and for the benefit of Fulton County.

If a majority of those voting in an election provided for by this Code section vote against the proposition submitted, Fulton County may elect to resubmit such proposition provided that the requirements of this Code section are satisfied.

Except as provided for to the contrary in this Code section, the additional tax provided for by this Code section shall be collected in the same manner and under the same conditions as set forth in Section 25 of the MARTA Act.

The tax provided for by this Code section shall not be subject to any restrictions as to rate provided for by the MARTA Act and shall not be subject to the provisions of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) or subsection (k) of Section 25 of the MARTA Act.

A tax levied under this Code section shall be added to the state sales and use tax imposed by Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 48, and the state revenue commissioner is authorized and directed to establish a bracket system by appropriate rules and regulations to collect the tax imposed under this Code section in the area of Fulton County outside the jurisdictional boundaries of the city.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “transit oriented development” means any commercial, residential, retail, or office building or development located on authority property or connected physically or functionally to a transit station, including, without limitation, joint development projects on authority property which provide for lease of authority property to private parties, convenient access to a transit station, and construction of a development for any such use. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the location of retail concessions within a transit station shall not alone constitute a transit oriented development.

With respect to any local jurisdiction levying a tax as provided for by this Code section, the power of zoning and planning provided for by Article IX, Section II, Paragraph IV of the Constitution of Georgia shall extend to transit oriented development and to authority property which is not part of the transportation system, transportation projects, or rapid transit system or projects of the authority as provided for by the MARTA Act.

“( ) YES Shall an additional sales tax of () be collected for a period of () insert rate insert number ( ) NO years in the portion of Fulton County outside of the City of Atlanta for the purpose of ()?” description of project or projects

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018.

32-9-16.
Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Overview Committee.

There is created the Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Overview Committee to be composed of the following 14 members: the chairperson of the State Planning and Community Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives; the chairperson of the State and Local Governmental Operations Committee of the Senate; the chairperson of the Ways and Means Committee of the House of Representatives; a member of the Banking and Financial Institutions Committee of the Senate to be selected by the President of the Senate; two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House, at least one of whom shall be from the area served by the authority; two members of the Senate, to be appointed by the President thereof, at least one of whom shall be from the area served by the authority; and three members of the House of Representatives and three members of the Senate appointed by the Governor, at least two of whom shall be from the area served by the authority. The appointed members of the committee shall serve two-year terms concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. The chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House from the membership of the committee, and the vice chairperson of the committee shall be appointed by the President of the Senate from the membership of the committee. The chairperson and vice chairperson shall serve terms of two years concurrent with their terms as members of the General Assembly. Vacancies in an appointed member’s position or in the offices of chairperson or vice chairperson of the committee shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. The committee shall periodically inquire into and review the operations, contracts, safety, financing, organization, and structure of the authority, as well as periodically review and evaluate the success with which said authority is accomplishing its legislatively created purposes.

The state auditor, the Georgia Department of Transportation, and the Attorney General shall make available to the committee the services of their staffs’ facilities and powers in order to assist the committee in its discharge of its duties herein set forth. The committee may employ staff and secure the services of independent accountants, engineers, and consultants. Upon authorization by joint resolution of the General Assembly, the committee shall have the power while the General Assembly is in session or during the interim between sessions to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents in aid of its duties. In addition, when the General Assembly is not in session, the committee shall have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents in aid of its duties, upon application of the chairperson of the committee with the concurrence of the Speaker of the House and the President of the Senate.

The authority shall cooperate with the committee, its authorized personnel, the Attorney General, the state auditor, and the Georgia Department of Transportation in order that the charges of the committee, set forth in this Code section, may be timely and efficiently discharged. The authority shall submit to the committee such reports and data as the committee shall reasonably require of the authority in order that the committee may adequately inform itself of the activities of the authority required by this Code section. The Attorney General is authorized to bring appropriate legal actions to enforce any laws specifically or generally relating to the authority or as to any subpoenas issued by the committee. The committee shall, on or before the first day of January of each year, and at such other times as it deems to be in the public interest, submit to the General Assembly a report of its findings and recommendations based upon the review of the operations of the authority, as set forth in this Code section.

In the discharge of its duties, the committee shall evaluate the performance of the authority in providing public transportation consistent with the following criteria:

Public safety;

Prudent, legal, and accountable expenditure of public funds;

Responsiveness to community needs and community desires;

Economic vitality of the transportation system and economic benefits to the community;

Efficient operation; and

Impact on the environment.

To assist in evaluating the performance of the authority, the committee may appoint a citizens’ advisory committee or committees. Such citizens’ advisory committee or committees shall act in an advisory capacity only.

The committee is authorized to expend state funds available to the committee for the discharge of its duties. Said funds may be used for the purposes of compensating staff personnel; paying the expenses of advertising notices of intention to amend the MARTA Act; paying for services of independent accountants, engineers, and consultants; paying necessary expenses of the citizens’ advisory committee or committees; and paying all other necessary expenses incurred by the committee in performing its duties.

The members of the committee shall receive the same compensation, per diem, expenses, and allowances for their service on the committee as is authorized by law for members of interim legislative study committees.

The funds necessary for the purposes of this Code section shall come from the funds appropriated to and available to the legislative branch of government.

Nothing contained within this Code section shall relieve the authority of the responsibilities imposed upon it under the MARTA Act for planning, designing, purchasing, acquiring, constructing, improving, equipping, financing, maintaining, administering, and operating a system of rapid transit for the metropolitan area of Atlanta.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 32/HB 737; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 32/HB 323; Code 1981, §

32-9-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “for planning” for “for the planning” in the middle of subsection (f).

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, redesignated former Code Section 32-9-14 as present Code Section 32-9-16; substituted “authority” for “Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority” throughout this Code section; substituted “MARTA Act” for “‘Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965,’ as amended” in the second sentence of paragraph (e)(1); and substituted “MARTA Act” for “‘Metropolitan Atlanta Rapid Transit Authority Act of 1965,’ as amended,” in the middle of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 32(2)/HB 737, codified Ga. L. 1999, p. 965, §§ 1-5, as this Code section.

32-9-17.
Logo and branding.

On and after January 1, 2019, the board shall utilize a logo and brand upon any newly acquired capital asset worth more than $250,000.00 that is regularly visible to the public which shall include the acronym “ATL” as a prominent feature.

On and after January 1, 2023, the board shall utilize a logo and brand upon any property of the authority which shall include the acronym “ATL” as a prominent feature.

Such branding and logo will in no manner change the official name, business, contracts, or other obligations of the authority.

The powers and duties conferred under this Code section shall be in addition to any powers and duties authorized in the MARTA Act and shall in no way be interpreted to repeal any portion of such Act.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018.

32-9-18.
Repeal of funding limitations.

Any provision of the MARTA Act which limits the amount the state may contribute to the system of the rapid transit system of the authority shall stand repealed.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018.

32-9-19.
Transportation services contracts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the MARTA Act, any county, municipality, special tax or community improvement district, political subdivision of this state within the metropolitan area, or any combination thereof may execute a transportation services contract with the authority to provide public transportation services, facilities, or both, for, to, or within such county, municipality, district, subdivision, or combination thereof. A transportation services contract executed pursuant to this subsection:

Shall not be a rapid transit contract subject to the conditions established therefor in Code Sections 32-9-20 and 32-9-22 or Section 24 of the MARTA Act;

May not utilize a method of financing those public transportation services or facilities provided under the contract which involves:

The issuance of bonds under subsection (c) of Section 24 of the MARTA Act;

The levy of the special retail sales and use tax described and authorized in Section 25 of the MARTA Act; or

Both methods described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph;

Shall require that the costs of any transportation services and facilities contracted for, as determined by the board on the basis of reasonable estimates, allocations of costs and capital, and projections, shall be borne by one or more of the following:

Fares;

Other revenues generated by such services or facilities;

Any subsidy provided, directly or indirectly, by or on behalf of the public entity with which the authority contracted for the services and facilities; or

A special retail sales and use tax described and authorized in Article 5B of Chapter 8 of Title 48; and

Shall be for services on the regional transit plan and approved by the Atlanta-regional Transit Link “ATL” Authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the MARTA Act, any county, municipality, special tax or community improvement district, political subdivision of this state outside the metropolitan area, or any combination thereof may execute a transportation services contract with the authority to provide public transportation services, facilities, or both, for, to, or within such county, municipality, district, subdivision, or combination thereof. Under a transportation services contract executed pursuant to this subsection:

The services and facilities shall be provided pursuant to a transportation services contract meeting the requirements therefor under subsection (a) of this Code section; and

The contract shall not authorize the construction of any extension of or addition to the authority’s existing rapid rail system.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018.

32-9-20.
Rapid transit contract with Gwinnett County.

Any provisions to the contrary in the MARTA Act notwithstanding and pursuant to the authority granted under a provision of the Constitution enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 1008, and subject to such limitations set forth in this Code section, the authority and the board of commissioners of Gwinnett County may negotiate and determine the extent of financial participation and the time or times such financial participation may be required with respect to Gwinnett County in order to finance the provision of a rapid transit system through the joint instrumentality of the authority. Except as provided in Code Section 32-9-19 if such county is entering into a transportation services contract, such determination shall take the form of a rapid transit contract to be entered into between the authority and the local government. The final execution of a rapid transit contract shall be completed in every instance in the manner hereinafter set forth in this Code section.

As one method of providing the financial participation determined by the board of commissioners and the authority to be Gwinnett County’s proper share of the cost of financing a rapid transit project or projects, Gwinnett County may, in the manner prescribed by law and subject to the conditions and limitations prescribed by law, issue its general obligation bonds, pay over the proceeds thereof to the authority, and thereby complete and make final the execution of the proposed rapid transit contract anticipated by such bond authorization and issuance and the authority shall agree in such contract to perform for such local government the aforesaid governmental function and to provide specified public transportation services and facilities.

As an alternative method of providing the financial participation determined by the board of commissioners and the authority to be Gwinnett County’s proper share of the cost of financing a rapid transit project or projects, Gwinnett County may enter into a rapid transit contract or contracts calling for the authority to perform for it the aforesaid governmental function and calling for it to make periodic payments to the authority for the public transportation services and facilities contracted for, which payments may include amounts required to defray the periodic principal and interest payments on any obligations issued by the authority for the purpose of financing the cost of any rapid transit project or projects, amounts necessary to establish and maintain reasonable reserves to insure the payment of said debt service and to provide for renewals, extensions, repairs and improvements and additions to any project or projects, and amounts required to defray any operational deficit which the system or any part thereof may incur from time to time.

The board of commissioners of Gwinnett County, subject to the conditions provided in this Code section, shall be authorized to enter into a rapid transit contract for and on behalf of the county with the authority for the provision of the aforesaid services and extension of the existing system to and from and within said county subject to approval by a majority of the qualified voters within said county voting in a referendum as provided for in subsection (c) of this Code section. As a condition precedent to the board of commissioners of Gwinnett County holding such referendum, if a rapid transit contract is entered into after January 1, 2019, the rapid transit service to be provided through the execution of a rapid transit contract shall be from the regional transit plan and approved by the Atlanta-regional Transit Link “ATL” Authority.

The procedure for holding the referendum called for in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be as follows: There shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation throughout the territory of Gwinnett County, once each week for four weeks immediately preceding the week during which the referendum is to be held, a notice to the electors thereof that on the day named therein an election will be held to determine the question of whether or not the local government shall enter into the proposed rapid transit contract and said notices shall contain the full text of said proposed contract, which contract shall set forth the obligations of the parties thereto. It is expressly provided, however, that none of the documents or exhibits which are incorporated in such contract by reference or are attached to such contract and made a part thereof shall be published. Such special election shall be held at all the election districts within the territorial limits of Gwinnett County. The question to be presented to the electorate in any such referendum shall be and shall be stated on the ballots or ballot label as follows:

“Gwinnett County has executed a contract for the provision of transit services, dated as of (

insert date

).

Shall this contract be approved?

YES
_______________
NO
_______________ ”

The question shall be published as a part of the aforesaid notice of election. Such election shall be governed by and held and conducted in accordance with the provisions of law from time to time governing the holding of special elections as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21, the “Georgia Election Code.” After the returns of such an election have been received, and the same have been canvassed and computed, the result shall be certified to the board of commissioners of Gwinnett County, in addition to any other person designated by law to receive the same, and such board of commissioners shall officially declare the result thereof.

If a majority of those voting in such an election vote in favor of the proposition submitted, then the rapid transit contract as approved shall become valid and binding in accordance with its terms.

The board of commissioners of Gwinnett County may elect any method provided in subsection (a) of this Code section to finance the participation required of it in whole or in part, and the election of one method shall not preclude the election of another method with respect thereto or with respect to any additional or supplementary participation determined to be necessary.

When the authority and the board of commissioners of Gwinnett County have completed and fully executed a rapid transit contract in compliance with the requirements of this Code section, and the voters shall have approved such contract as herein provided, such contract shall constitute an obligation on the part of the local government for the payment of which its good faith and credit are pledged, but in no other way can the good faith and credit of any local government be pledged with respect to a rapid transit contract.

The board of commissioners of Gwinnett County may use public funds to provide for a rapid transit system within the metropolitan area and may levy and collect any taxes authorized to it by law to the extent necessary to fulfill the obligations incurred in a rapid transit contract or contracts with the authority.

Gwinnett County may transfer to the authority any property or facilities, or render any services, with or without consideration, which may be useful to the establishment, operation, or administration of the rapid transit system contemplated hereunder, and may contract with the authority for any other purpose incidental to the establishment, operation, or administration of such system, or any part or project thereof or the usual facilities related thereto.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-9-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 3-1/HB 930.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018.